Washington statutes.
RCW 36.62.300

Work ordered and materials purchased.

All work ordered and materials purchased by a hospital shall be subject to the requirements established in RCW 70.44.140 for public hospital districts.

[ 1991 c 363 s 76.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Captions not law—1991 c 363: See notes following RCW 2.32.180.